Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3005
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to expand the capacity to provide civil legal services to eligible low-income persons equally throughout the state.

Laws 2006, LB 746, § 1.